Hawaii statutes.
§200D-3 Kaneohe Bay regional council;
general powers, duties, and functions. The council shall have the
following powers and duties and perform the following functions:

(1) Facilitate the implementation of the master plan
as it relates to ocean use activities;

(2) Review and periodically amend the master plan as
it relates to ocean use activities;

(3) Serve as a central coordinative clearinghouse of
public and private activities in Kaneohe Bay, and as a repository and
disseminator of information on the bay;

(4) Facilitate productive interaction between users
of the bay and the general public in order to develop a common vision and make
recommendations for public policy related to the bay;

(5) Recommend research, studies, data collection, and
planning activities designed to provide additional information on Kaneohe Bay,
with particular reference to the specific needs of the bay, and to publicize
the results thereof, to the extent that these functions do not duplicate or
supplant activities provided by other state or county agencies;

(6) Advise and make recommendations to the State and
the county on matters regarding the use of Kaneohe Bay by the general public,
marine research programs, and commercial ocean use activities, including
legislative matters;

(7) Develop short- and long-term goals based on the
master plan, resources, and programs for Kaneohe Bay;

(8) Educate the public and users of Kaneohe Bay on
the problems and needs of the bay through public education programs;

(9) Serve as the public advocate for Kaneohe Bay;

(10) Initiate and maintain contact with public,
private, county, and state organizations, agencies, and individuals engaging in
activities in Kaneohe Bay;

(11) Establish a Kaneohe Bay fishing panel to monitor
fishing activities in the bay, as recommended in the master plan as it relates
to ocean use activities; and

(12) Hold quarterly meetings on the status of the
implementation of the master plan. [L 1993, c 317, pt of §2, §7; am L
1998, c 4, §3 and c 129, §4; am L 2009, c 68, §1; am L 2010, c 19, §4; am L
2014, c 85, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next